Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2200XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 102 Section 1. Section 279.70, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. By July 1, 2026, the board of directors 3 of a school district shall require annual, evidence-based 4 training on educator mental wellness and self-identification 5 and mitigation of negative mental health symptoms for 6 all school personnel who hold a license, certificate, 7 authorization, or statement of recognition issued by the board 8 of educational examiners and who have regular contact with 9 students in kindergarten through grade twelve. The training 10 shall take place within the first sixty days of the beginning 11 of a school calendar, and the content of the training shall 12 be based on nationally recognized best practices. The state 13 board of education shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 14 determine the qualifications required of a person who conducts 15 training pursuant to this subsection. 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. By July 1, 2026, the board of directors 17 of a school district shall require annual, evidence-based 18 training on student social and emotional wellness and the 19 identification and mitigation of negative mental health 20 symptoms in students for all school personnel who hold 21 a license, certificate, authorization, or statement of 22 recognition issued by the board of educational examiners and 23 who have regular contact with students in kindergarten through 24 grade twelve. The training shall take place in January or 25 February, and the content of the training shall be based 26 on nationally recognized best practices. The state board 27 of education shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 28 determine the qualifications required of a person who conducts 29 training pursuant to this subsection. 30